Arkansas, session 2025, HB1729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-66-210, concerning the Homestead
Exemption Act, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(e) The homestead exemption provided in this section may be claimed by
a member of a limited liability company that owns the homestead if:
(1) There are two (2) members of the limited liability company,
and the members are a married couple; or
(2) There is only one (1) member of the limited liability
company, and that member is a natural person who is married or the head of a
family.




*JLL281*
03/07/2025 3:09:43 PM JLL281